Hawaii, session 2026, SB2574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201-     Production permits; production tax credit; information; public notice.  (a)  Whenever the department, pursuant to section 201-3(b) or 201-14: (1)  Issues a permit to; or (2)  Enters into a memorandum of agreement or memorandum of understanding with, any person to film a motion picture, television show, television commercial, or other visually recorded production at state-administered locations under the department's film permitting authority, the department shall, within five business days, provide public notice of the information required in subsection (c); provided that during emergency situations, the department shall provide public notice of the information required in subsection (c) within fourteen business days. The information required in subsection (c) shall also be made available, at the same time public notice is provided, on a publicly accessible part of the department's website. (b) Whenever the department, in accordance with section 235-17: (1)  Receives registration for prequalification by a taxpayer pursuant to section 235-17(f;) or (2)  Determines that a taxpayer qualifies for the motion picture, digital media, and film production income tax credit, the department shall, within five business days, provide public notification of the information required in subsection (c); provided that during emergency situations, the department shall provide public notice of the information required in subsection (c) within fourteen business days. The information required in subsection (c) shall also be made available, at the same time public notice is provided, on a publicly accessible part of the department's website. As used in this subsection, "taxpayer" means a person subject to a tax imposed by chapter 235. (c)  The information provided by the department shall consist of: (1)  The name of the production; and (2)  The contact information of a designated representative for the production, including the representative's phone number, electronic mail address, and physical mailing address. (d)  Any individual may sign up with the department to receive the public notice required under this section.  The department shall provide the public notice by electronic mail or, subject to any reasonable fee the department may assess to recover the costs of postage, supplies, staffing, and other related expenses, postal mail. (e)  The department shall provide public notice required under this section once per year per production. (f) The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this section." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________